Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2139.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 123B.02, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 26. new text end new text begin Postsecondary scholarships and grants for career and technical students. new text end new text begin A school board may expend school funds for postsecondary scholarships and postsecondary grants consistent with section 124D.4532. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 124D.452, is amended to read: 124D.452 DISTRICT REPORT; CAREER AND TECHNICAL EDUCATION. new text begin (a) new text end Each district and cooperative center must report data to the Department of Education for all career and technical education programs as required by the department. new text begin (b) A district or cooperative center offering a postsecondary scholarship or grant consistent with section 124D.4532 must report its revenue and expenditures for the program in the form and manner required by the department. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin [124D.4532] POSTSECONDARY SCHOLARSHIPS AND GRANTS FOR CAREER AND TECHNICAL STUDENTS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Eligibility. new text end new text begin A career and technical education program operated by a school district or a cooperative unit may provide a postsecondary scholarship or a postsecondary grant to an eligible student. An eligible student must: new text end new text begin (1) apply for the scholarship or grant during the student's senior year in the form and manner specified by the school board; new text end new text begin (2) successfully complete the career and technical education course that generated the net proceeds; and new text end new text begin (3) graduate from a Minnesota high school. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Scholarship and grant amounts. new text end new text begin (a) A school district or cooperative unit may annually set aside some or all net proceeds from a career and technical program when the revenue generated by the program is greater than the costs the school incurred in offering the program. The Department of Education may provide accounting guidelines to the school district or cooperative unit to determine the program's net proceeds. new text end new text begin (b) A school district may determine the amount of each individual student scholarship or grant so as not to exceed the annual net proceeds calculated under paragraph (a). new text end new text begin (c) A scholarship or grant may be used by a student for tuition and expenses to attend a postsecondary institution, the costs of a certificate program, or a student's costs associated with enrollment in a registered apprenticeship program. A grant may be used by a student directly entering the workforce or military for supplies needed for the student's chosen career pathway. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end